Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-585.1:3.
Pilot programs for community solar development.

As used in this section:“Eligible generation facility” means an electrical generation facility that:

Exclusively uses energy derived from sunlight;

Is placed in service on or after July 1, 2017;

Is not constructed by an investor-owned utility and either (i) is acquired by an investor-owned utility through an asset purchase agreement or (ii) is subject to a power purchase agreement under which an investor-owned utility purchases the facility’s
output from a third party; and

Has a generating capacity of:

Not more than two megawatts; or

More than two megawatts if not more than two megawatts of the output from the electrical generation facility is selected in an investor-owned utility’s RFP for dedication to its pilot program.“Generating capacity” means an electrical generation facility’s
nameplate rated capacity measured in direct current megawatts.“Investor-owned utility” means an electric utility that is a Phase I Utility or a Phase II Utility.“Low-income community” means a census tract within
the Commonwealth designated by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development in 2019 or any year thereafter as a qualified census tract for purposes of the Low-Income Housing Tax Credit pursuant to § 42 of
the Internal Revenue Code.“Participating generating facility” means an eligible generation facility that is selected by an investor-owned utility through its RFP for inclusion in its pilot program.“Participating
third party” means, for investor-owned utilities, a Virginia nonresidential-class customer, an affiliate, a solar development entity, or a nonjurisdictional customer that takes on the obligation, as part of a variable-output
contract, of pilot program costs not recovered through the voluntary companion rate schedule as specified in subdivision B 8.“Participating utility” means (i) each investor-owned utility and (ii) any utility consumer
services cooperative that elects to conduct a pilot program under subsection C.“Phase I Utility” means an investor-owned incumbent electric utility that was, as of July 1, 1999, not bound by a rate case settlement
adopted by the Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002.“Phase II Utility” means an investor-owned incumbent electric utility that was, as of July 1, 1999, bound by a rate case settlement
adopted by the Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002.“Pilot program” means a community solar pilot program conducted by a participating utility pursuant to this section following approval
by the Commission, under which the participating utility sells electric power to subscribing customers under a voluntary companion rate schedule and the participating utility generates or purchases electric power
from participating generation facilities selected by the participating utility.“Pilot program costs” means all of a participating utility’s identified, projected, and actual costs of its pilot program, including
costs for (i) purchased power; (ii) renewable and other environmental attributes; (iii) transmission and distribution services; (iv) generating capacity and energy balancing; (v) RFP process costs; (vi) administrative
and marketing charges; (vii) capital costs and operations and maintenance expenses related to building, owning, and operating eligible generating facilities; and (viii) a reasonable margin, which margin shall be
the weighted average cost of capital.“Pilot program period” means the three-year period ending three years following the date the first subscription is entered into by a customer.“RFP” means the request for proposal
process conducted by an investor-owned utility.“Small eligible generation facility” means an eligible generation facility with a generating capacity of less than 0.5 megawatt.“Solar development entity” means a business
entity organized primarily for the purpose of proposing, developing, constructing, purchasing, or selling at wholesale all or part of the output of an eligible generation facility. A solar development entity may
be organized in any form and may be a special purpose entity.“Utility aggregation cooperative” has the same meaning ascribed to “cooperative” in § 56-231.38.“Utility consumer services cooperative” has the same meaning
ascribed to “cooperative” in § 56-231.15.“Voluntary companion rate schedule” means a rate schedule approved by the Commission upon application by a participating utility that provides for the recovery of the pilot
program costs by the participating utility.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of § 56-234 and §§ 56-249.6 and 56-585.1, each investor-owned utility shall conduct a pilot program for retail customers as follows:

Each investor-owned utility shall design its own pilot program and within six months of receiving Commission approval shall make subscriptions for participation in its pilot program available to its retail customers on a voluntary basis.

An investor-owned utility shall select eligible generating facilities for dedication to its pilot program through an RFP process, under which process:

Each investor-owned utility shall have issued one or more public RFPs for eligible generating facilities and the purchase of all energy output and associated renewable energy certificates and other environmental attributes.

Each RFP shall:

State the price and non-price criteria used by the investor-owned utility in selecting proposals for dedication to its pilot program; and

Require as a criterion for selection that eligible generating facilities with a combined generating capacity of not less than two megawatts, and any eligible generating facility with a generating capacity of more than two megawatts, be first placed in
service on or after July 1, 2017.

Each investor-owned utility is authorized to select, under an asset purchase or power purchase agreement, small eligible generating facilities for dedication to its pilot program without regard to whether price criteria are satisfied by their selection
if the selection of the small eligible generating facilities (i) materially advances non-price criteria, including a criterion favoring geographic distribution of eligible generating facilities, provided that the
generating capacity of small eligible generating facilities does not exceed 25 percent of the utility’s pilot program’s minimum generating capacity specified in subdivision 3, or (ii) is located in a low-income
community as provided in subdivision 15.

An investor-owned utility shall not select through its RFP an electrical generation facility with a generating capacity of more than two megawatts for its pilot program unless (i) the costs can be appropriately documented for the portion of the facility’s
output, which portion shall not exceed two megawatts, that is dedicated to the pilot program and (ii) for a Phase II Utility only, the portion of the facility’s generating capacity selected pursuant to this subdivision
does not exceed 50 percent of the investor-owned utility’s pilot program’s minimum generating capacity specified in subdivision 3. The portion of the facility’s generating capacity that exceeds the portion of the
facility’s generating capacity that is selected pursuant to this subdivision shall not be applied in determining whether the pilot program satisfies requirements of subdivision 3 regarding a pilot program’s minimum
generating capacity.

In selecting eligible generating facilities for dedication to its pilot program, an investor-owned utility shall give due consideration to relative costs, economic development benefits, and geographic diversity of eligible generating facilities and ensure
that the selection of such facilities complies with the requirements of subdivision 15 regarding the location of eligible generating facilities in low-income communities.

The investor-owned utility’s application to the Commission shall include a description of the application of the price and non-price criteria in the investor-owned utility’s selection of participating generating facilities from among the proposals submitted
in response to the RFP.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of § 56-234 and §§ 56-249.6 and 56-585.1, upon application of a utility consumer services cooperative the Commission shall review a proposal submitted by the cooperative for a voluntary companion rate schedule.
If the Commission finds that the proposal is reasonable and prudent, it shall approve the voluntary companion rate schedule for the cooperative to conduct a pilot program pursuant to this section. No utility consumer services cooperative
shall be required to conduct a pilot program pursuant to this section. In making an application to the Commission pursuant to this subsection, a utility consumer services cooperative shall have flexibility to design its voluntary
companion rate schedule in a manner that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, provides the cooperative the ability to:

Construct or purchase its generating facilities, or dedicate a portion of its existing power supply portfolio, for its community solar pilot program along with one or more other utility consumer services cooperatives, one or both Phase I or Phase II Utilities,
or a utility aggregation cooperative, through requests for proposal or through a contract with a third party or a utility aggregation cooperative;

If constructing or purchasing its generating facilities, or dedicating a portion of its existing power supply portfolio, for its pilot program through a utility aggregation cooperative, include generating facilities that may be already in service or may
be first placed into service at any time;

Utilize generating facilities of any generating capacity for its pilot program;

Physically locate the generating facilities used for the pilot program inside or outside of its certificated service territory;

Design its voluntary companion rate schedule in coordination with one or more utility consumer services cooperatives, such that participating subscribers from both cooperatives subscribe to an identical rate schedule;

Permanently end its pilot program for all subscribers according to the terms of the voluntary companion rate schedule; and

Recover pilot program costs that are not recovered through the voluntary companion rate schedule by including unrecovered purchased power expense in the cooperative’s cost of purchased power and through a regulatory asset for unrecovered costs that are
not purchased power expense, subject to the oversight of the cooperative’s board of directors, which regulatory asset shall be approved by the Commission.

The participation of retail customers in a pilot program administered by a participating utility in the Commonwealth is in the public interest. Voluntary companion rate schedules approved by the Commission pursuant to this section are necessary in order
to acquire information which is in furtherance of the public interest. The Commission shall approve the recovery of pilot program costs that it deems to be reasonable and prudent. The Commission shall also approve the pilot program
design, the voluntary companion rate schedule, and the portfolio of participating generating facilities. No Commission review or approval of individual participating generating facilities, agreements, sites, or RFPs shall be required
pursuant to this section or any other section of the Code.

Any voluntary companion rate schedule approved by the Commission pursuant to this section shall not be considered a tariff for electric energy provided 100 percent from renewable energy pursuant to § 56-577.

Each participating utility shall report on the status of its pilot program, including the number of subscribing customers, to the Governor, the Commission, and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce
and Labor. The report shall be filed the earlier of (i) three years after the date a customer of the participating utility first subscribes to its pilot program or (ii) July 1, 2022. If a participating utility closes its pilot
program to new subscribers pursuant to subdivision B 14, it shall notify the Governor, the Commission, and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor not later than
three months after such closure, which notification shall (a) describe the reasons for the closure and (b) be provided in lieu of the status report otherwise required by this subsection.

At any time after filing its report on the status of its pilot program as required by subsection F, a participating utility may, in its application proceeding, move the Commission to make its pilot program permanent. The motion shall include a compliance
filing with conforming changes to the participating utility’s applicable rate schedules. Upon the Commission’s granting of the motion, the pilot program shall become a regular rate schedule of the participating utility.

3.
The amount of generating capacity of the eligible generating facilities in an investor-owned utility’s pilot program shall not be less than (i) 0.5 megawatt if the pilot program is conducted by a Phase I Utility or (ii)
10 megawatts if the pilot program is conducted by a Phase II Utility.

4.
The amount of generating capacity of the eligible generating facilities in an investor-owned utility’s pilot program shall not exceed (i) 10 megawatts if the pilot program is conducted by a Phase I Utility or (ii) 40 megawatts
if the pilot program is conducted by a Phase II Utility.

5.
An investor-owned utility shall have the option of increasing the amount of generating capacity of the eligible generating facilities in its pilot program above the amount most recently approved by the Commission, in such
increments as the investor-owned utility elects, as follows:

a.
Any such increase shall not result in an amount of generating capacity that exceeds the cap specified for the investor-owned utility’s pilot program under subdivision 4;

b.
No such increase shall be authorized until such time that 90 percent of the amount of generating capacity of the eligible generating facilities then approved for its pilot program has been subscribed by customers through
the investor-owned utility’s voluntary companion rate schedule;

c.
An investor-owned utility may seek any number of increases in the amount of generating capacity of the eligible generating facilities in its pilot program, subject to the conditions in subdivisions a and b; and

d.
The investor-owned utility shall select eligible generating facilities for any increase in the generating capacity of its pilot program through an RFP process that complies with the requirements of subdivision 2.

6.
Each pilot program shall expire at the end of its pilot program period, unless renewed or made permanent as provided in subsection G.

7.
The renewable energy certificates and other environmental attributes associated with the voluntary companion rate schedule shall be retired by the investor-owned utility on the subscribing customer’s behalf.

8.
An investor-owned utility shall recover all its pilot program costs primarily through its voluntary companion rate schedule. However, pilot program costs that are not recovered through the voluntary companion rate schedule
shall be recoverable from a participating third party and not from the investor-owned utility’s Virginia jurisdictional customers. To the extent participating third parties are obligated for pilot program costs not recovered through
the voluntary companion rate schedule, variable-output contracts between participating third parties other than affiliates and investor-owned utilities shall be negotiated at arm’s length and shall not be reviewable by the Commission
and shall require no further Commission approvals pursuant to Chapter 4 (§ 56-76 et seq.) or other applicable law.

9.
At the conclusion of the pilot program period, to the extent that the pilot program is not made permanent or extended, each participating generating facility shall cease to be part of the pilot program and shall return to
operation under the variable-output contract with a participating third party.

10.
Any fixed generation costs and fixed purchased power costs shall remain fixed for subscribing customers throughout the duration of the subscribing customers’ continuous and uninterrupted participation in the voluntary companion
rate schedule. A subscribing customer’s participation in the voluntary companion rate schedule shall be deemed to be continuous and uninterrupted notwithstanding a change in the location where the customer receives service if the new
location continues to be within the investor-owned utility’s service territory and the customer provides the investor-owned utility with notice of the change prior to or within 90 days following the change. Investor-owned utilities
are authorized to decrease the generation or purchased power rate, or both, at any time to reflect cost reductions, if any, subject to Commission review. If, pursuant to subdivision 9, the pilot program is not made permanent or continued,
the subscribing customers’ subscriptions to the voluntary companion rate schedule shall survive the termination of the pilot program.

11.
A subscribing customer’s usage that exceeds the amount subscribed for under the voluntary companion rate schedule shall be billed under the customer’s applicable standard rate.

12.
An investor-owned utility shall not require a subscribing customer to enter an agreement or subscription for participation in a pilot program of more than 12 months’ duration unless the subscribing customer’s subscription
exceeds 100 kW, or its equivalent in kWh, at the time the customer initially enters into the agreement or subscription.

13.
As part of an arrangement with a solar development entity, a utility may enter into an agreement that provides for risk sharing and collaboration in marketing a utility’s pilot program if the solar development entity is
a participating third party.

14.
An investor-owned utility shall have the ability to close its pilot program to new subscribers according to the terms of the voluntary companion rate schedule upon notice to the Commission. This option shall be exercisable
once per year, upon the anniversary date of the Commission’s order approving the voluntary companion rate schedule.

15.
Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, effective July 1, 2020, an investor-owned utility shall not select an eligible generating facility that is located outside a low-income community for dedication
to its pilot program unless the investor-owned utility contemporaneously selects for dedication to its pilot program one or more eligible generating facilities that are located within a low-income community and of which the pilot program
costs equal or exceed the pilot program costs of the eligible generating facility that is located outside a low-income community.

History.
2017, c. 580; 2019, cc. 742, 763; 2020, c. 663.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 580, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not abridge, amend, repeal, or otherwise affect any applications brought before the State Corporation Commission or programs and tariffs approved by the Commission pursuant to any
section of the Code of Virginia that is not enacted by this act.”

Acts 2017, c. 580, cl. 3 provides: “That prior to submitting a proposed community solar pilot program to the State Corporation Commission for approval, each Phase I and Phase II Utility, as defined in § 56-585.1:3 of the Code of Virginia, as created by
this act, shall examine, in cooperation with representatives of relevant governmental, nonprofit, and for-profit entities, options to facilitate the subscription by low-income customers to the utility’s community solar pilot program.
The utility may apply to governmental, nonprofit, and for-profit entities for grants, sponsorships, donations, or other funds to be applied to the specific purpose of lowering the costs to low-income customers of subscribing to the
utility’s community solar pilot program.”

Acts 2017, c. 580, cl. 4 provides: “That as part of the State Corporation Commission’s review of applications brought pursuant to this act, the State Corporation Commission shall ensure that participating utilities include in their marketing materials
for the pilot program a consumer disclosure indicating the cost difference between the voluntary companion rate schedule and the subscribing customer’s electric rate but for its participation in the pilot program.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 17 provides: “That each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall investigate potential improvements to the net energy metering programs
as provided under § 56-594 of the Code of Virginia, potential improvements to the pilot programs for community solar development as provided under § 56-585.1:3 of the Code of Virginia, expansion of options for customers with corporate
clean energy procurement targets, and impediments to the siting of new renewable energy projects. Each such utility shall include interested stakeholders in the investigation of such issues and the development of proposed legislation
and shall issue a report of its findings to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor by November 1, 2018.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing, including at least one non-demand rate schedule. Customer-generators or agricultural customer-generators participating in net metering may elect to be served under such
time-varying rate schedule at such time as the customer-generator or agricultural customer-generator is served by advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to the utility.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 4 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
an incentive program for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers served under time-varying retail rate schedules that have advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to
the utility.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairmen of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “the Chairmen of the House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees” in subsection
F. March 10, 2021.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 742 and 763 are identical, and in subdivision B 6, substituted “as provided in subsection G” for “by appropriate legislation”; and added subsection G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 663, in subsection A, inserted the definition for “Low-income community”; in subdivision B 2 c, added “or (ii) is located in a low-income community as provided in subdivision 15”; in subdivision B 2 e, added “and ensure that the
selection of such facilities complies with the requirements of subdivision 15 regarding the location of eligible generating facilities in low-income communities”; added subdivision B 15 and made stylistic changes.

§ 56-585.1:4.
Development of solar and wind generation and energy storage capacity in the Commonwealth.

Prior to January 1, 2024, (i) the construction or purchase by a public utility of one or more solar or wind generation facilities located in the Commonwealth or off the Commonwealth’s Atlantic shoreline, each having a rated capacity of at least one megawatt
and having in the aggregate a rated capacity that does not exceed 5,000 megawatts, or (ii) the purchase by a public utility of energy, capacity, and environmental attributes from solar facilities described in clause (i) owned by
persons other than a public utility is in the public interest, and the Commission shall so find if required to make a finding regarding whether such construction or purchase is in the public interest.

Prior to January 1, 2024, (i) the construction or purchase by a public utility of one or more solar or wind generation facilities located in the Commonwealth or off the Commonwealth’s Atlantic shoreline, each having a rated capacity of less than one megawatt,
including rooftop solar installations with a capacity of not less than 50 kilowatts, and having in the aggregate a rated capacity that does not exceed 500 megawatts, or (ii) the purchase by a public utility of energy, capacity,
and environmental attributes from solar facilities described in clause (i) owned by persons other than a public utility is in the public interest, and the Commission shall so find if required to make a finding regarding whether
such construction or purchase is in the public interest.

The aggregate cap of 5,000 megawatts of rated capacity described in clause (i) of subsection A, the aggregate cap of 500 megawatts of rated capacity described in clause (i) of subsection B, and the aggregate cap of 200 megawatts of rated capacity described
in subsection I are separate and independent from each other. The capacity of facilities in subsection B shall not be counted in determining the capacity of facilities in subsection A or I; the capacity of facilities in subsection
A shall not be counted in determining the capacity of facilities in subsection B or I; and the capacity of facilities in subsection I shall not be counted in determining the capacity of facilities in subsection A or B.

Twenty-five percent of the solar generation capacity placed in service on or after July 1, 2018, located in the Commonwealth, and found to be in the public interest pursuant to subsection A or B shall be from the purchase by a public utility of energy,
capacity, and environmental attributes from solar facilities owned by persons other than a public utility. The remainder shall be construction or purchase by a public utility of one or more solar generation facilities located in
the Commonwealth. All of the solar generation capacity located in the Commonwealth and found to be in the public interest pursuant to subsection A or B shall be subject to competitive procurement, provided that a public utility
may select solar generation capacity without regard to whether such selection satisfies price criteria if the selection of the solar generating capacity materially advances non-price criteria, including favoring geographic distribution
of generating capacity, areas of higher employment, or regional economic development, if such non-price solar generating capacity selected does not exceed 25 percent of the utility’s solar generating capacity.

Construction, purchasing, or leasing activities for a test or demonstration project for a new utility-owned and utility-operated generating facility or facilities utilizing energy derived from offshore wind with an aggregate capacity of not more than
16 megawatts are in the public interest.

Prior to January 1, 2035, (i) the construction by a public utility of one or more energy storage facilities located in the Commonwealth, having in the aggregate a rated capacity that does not exceed 2,700 megawatts, or (ii) the purchase by a public utility
of energy storage facilities described in clause (i) owned by persons other than a public utility or the capacity from such facilities is in the public interest, and the Commission shall so find if required to make a finding regarding
whether such construction or purchase is in the public interest.

At least 35 percent of the energy storage capacity placed in service on or after July 1, 2020, located in the Commonwealth and found to be in the public interest pursuant to subsection F shall be from the purchase by a public utility of energy storage
facilities owned by persons other than a public utility or the capacity from such facilities. All of the energy storage facilities located in the Commonwealth and found to be in the public interest pursuant to subsection F shall
be subject to competitive procurement, provided that a public utility may select energy storage facilities without regard to whether such selection satisfies price criteria if the selection of the energy storage facilities materially
advances non-price criteria, including favoring geographic distribution of generating facilities, areas of higher employment, or regional economic development, if such energy storage facilities selected for the advancement of non-price
criteria do not exceed 25 percent of the utility’s energy storage capacity.

A utility may elect to petition the Commission, outside of a triennial review proceeding conducted pursuant to § 56-585.1, at any time for a prudency determination with respect to the construction or purchase by the utility of one or more solar or wind
generation facilities located in the Commonwealth or off the Commonwealth’s Atlantic Shoreline or the purchase by the utility of energy, capacity, and environmental attributes from solar or wind facilities owned by persons other
than the utility. The Commission’s final order regarding any such petition shall be entered by the Commission not more than three months after the date of the filing of such petition.

Prior to January 1, 2024, (i) the construction or purchase by a public utility of one or more solar or wind generation facilities located on a previously developed project site in the Commonwealth having in the aggregate a rated capacity that does not
exceed 200 megawatts or (ii) the purchase by a public utility of energy, capacity, and environmental attributes from solar facilities described in clause (i) owned by persons other than a public utility, is in the public interest.

History.
2018, c. 296; 2020, cc. 1190, 1193, 1194, 1225.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

Acts 2020, c. 863, cl. 1 provides: “The State Corporation Commission shall create a task force to evaluate and analyze the regulatory, market, and local barriers to the deployment of distribution and transmission-connected bulk energy storage resources
to help integrate renewable energy into the electrical grid, reduce costs for the electricity system, allow customers to deploy storage technologies to reduce their energy costs, and allow customers to participate in electricity markets
for energy, capacity, and ancillary services. The task force shall include representatives of municipalities, the Virginia Solar Energy Development and Energy Storage Authority, the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy, the Office
of the Attorney General, and at least one representative each from the following sectors: regulated electric service providers, competitive electric service providers, rural utility consumer services cooperatives, commercial or industrial
energy customers or an association representing such customers, and energy storage companies or an association representing such companies. The task force may consult with the regional transmission organization. In its evaluation,
the task force shall (i) assess the potential costs and benefits, including impacts to the transmission and distribution systems, of such energy storage resources and (ii) assess how electric utilities, competitive service providers,
customers, and other third parties are able to deploy energy storage resources in the bulk market, in the utility system, and in behind-the-meter applications. The State Corporation Commission shall submit a copy of the task force’s
evaluation and analysis to the General Assembly no later than October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 13 provides: “That this bill shall be referred to as the Virginia Clean Economy Act.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1190 inserted subsections F and G, and redesignated former subsection F as subsection H. The amendment by c. 1190 is similar to the amendments by c. 1193 and 1994 except that subsection F, as added by c. 1190, begins “Prior to
January 1, 2030” and subsection G, as added by c. 1190, begins “At least 65 percent.” The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1193 and 1194 are identical, and inserted subsections F and G and redesignated former subsection F as subsection H.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1225, in subsection C, inserted “and the aggregate cap of 200 megawatts of rated capacity described in subsection G” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, inserted “or G” twice, and added “and the capacity of facilities
in subsection G shall not be counted in determining the capacity of facilities in subsection A or B”; added subsection G; and made stylistic changes. Subsection G was redesignated as subsection I at the direction of the Virginia Code
Commission.